Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.310.020

Changes in number of, boundaries—Initiating, hearings, considerations—Superintendent's duties.

The superintendent of public instruction upon his or her own initiative, or upon petition of any educational service district board, or upon petition of at least half of the district superintendents within an educational service district, or upon request of the state board of education, may make changes in the number and boundaries of the educational service districts, including an equitable adjustment and transfer of any and all property, assets, and liabilities among the educational service districts whose boundaries and duties and responsibilities are increased and/or decreased by such changes, consistent with the purposes of RCW 28A.310.010: PROVIDED, That no reduction in the number of educational service districts will take effect after June 30, 1995, without a majority approval vote by the affected school directors voting in such election by mail ballot. Prior to making any such changes, the superintendent of public instruction, or his or her designee, shall hold at least one public hearing on such proposed action and shall consider any recommendations on such proposed action.

The superintendent of public instruction in making any change in boundaries shall give consideration to, but not be limited by, the following factors: Size, population, topography, and climate of the proposed district.

The superintendent of public instruction shall furnish personnel, material, supplies, and information necessary to enable educational service district boards and superintendents to consider the proposed changes.

[ 2018 c 177 s 101; 1994 sp.s. c 6 s 513; 1993 sp.s. c 24 s 522; 1990 c 33 s 270; 1977 ex.s. c 283 s 2; 1971 ex.s. c 282 s 2; 1969 ex.s. c 176 s 2. Formerly RCW 28A.21.020, 28.19.505.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—2018 c 177: See note following RCW 28A.305.905.

Severability—1994 sp.s. c 6: "If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1994 sp.s. c 6 s 904.]

Effective date—1994 sp.s. c 6: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and shall take effect immediately [April 6, 1994]." [ 1994 sp.s. c 6 s 905.]

Severability—1993 sp.s. c 24: "If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1993 sp.s. c 24 s 932.]

Effective dates—1993 sp.s. c 24: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and shall take effect July 1, 1993, except for section 308(5) of this act which shall take effect immediately [May 28, 1993]." [ 1993 sp.s. c 24 s 933.]

Severability—1977 ex.s. c 283: See note following RCW 28A.310.010.

Severability—1971 ex.s. c 282: See note following RCW 28A.310.010.

Severability—Rights preserved—1969 ex.s. c 176: See notes following RCW 28A.310.010.